Utah statutes.
78B-4-303.   Prevention of unfounded lawsuits -- Exemption.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a manufacturer, packer, distributor, carrier, holder, seller, marketer, advertiser of a food, or an association of one or more such entities, may not be subject to civil liability arising under any state statute, rule, public policy, court or administrative decision, municipal ordinance, or other action having the effect of law, for any claim of obesity or weight gain resulting from the consumption of food.

(2)  Subsection (1) may not apply where the claim of obesity or weight gain is based on:

(a)  a material violation of an adulteration or misbranding requirement prescribed by state or federal statute, rule, regulation, or ordinance and the claimed injury was proximately caused by the violation; or

(b)  any other material violation of federal or state law applicable to the manufacturing, marketing, distribution, advertising, labeling, or sale of food, provided that the violation is knowing and willful, and the claimed injury was proximately caused by the violation.

